Utah statutes.
58-67-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Physicians Licensing Board consisting of nine
physicians and surgeons and two members of the general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201.
(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance
with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.
(b)  The board may also designate one of its members on a permanent or
rotating basis to:
(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or
unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and
(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or
advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the
board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning that complaint.
